New York, session 2025-2026, S1570.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2167-a to read as follows: 3 § 2167-a. Administering a vaccine to a minor; consent. 1. A health 4 care practitioner may administer a vaccine to a minor who is at least 5 fourteen years of age if the minor has the capacity to consent and 6 provides informed consent to the administering of the vaccine. 7 2. Prior to administering any vaccine under this section, the health 8 care practitioner shall consult with and counsel the minor to ensure 9 that the minor fully understands and appreciates the nature and conse- 10 quences of receiving the vaccine, has the capacity to consent and is 11 providing informed consent, and that the vaccine indicated for the minor 12 is not contraindicated by the minor's medical history. 13 3. For the purposes of this section: 14 a. "Health care practitioner" means a health care practitioner 15 licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to practice under title 16 eight of the education law, acting within the practitioner's lawful 17 scope of practice. 18 b. "Vaccine" means a biological product intended to confer immuniza- 19 tion to an infection or disease which meets the standards approved by 20 the United States public health service for such biological products, 21 and is consistent with a recommendation of the advisory committee on 22 immunization practices of the centers for disease control and prevention 23 with respect to the patient involved, or which is approved by the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03768-01-5 S. 1570 2 1 department under such conditions as may be specified by the public 2 health council. 3 c. "Capacity to consent" means an individual's ability, determined 4 without regard to the individual's age, to understand and appreciate the 5 nature and consequences of the proposed vaccination, and to make an 6 informed decision concerning the administration of the vaccine. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.